Illinois, session 104th, HB2894.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Architectural, Engineering, and Land 5Surveying Qualifications Based Selection Act is amended by 6changing Section 45 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 535/45)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4151-45)8    Sec. 45. Small contracts. 9    (a) The provisions of Sections 25, 30, and 35 do not apply 10to architectural, engineering, and land surveying contracts 11with an estimated basic professional services fee of less than 12the maximum estimated basic professional services fee set 13forth in this Section $25,000.14    (b) As used in this Section: 15    "Consumer price index-u" means the index published by the 16Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 17Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 18services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 19average, all items, 1982-84=100. 20    "Maximum estimated basic professional services fee" means: 21        (1) for contracts entered into before the effective 22    date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 23    $25,000;   HB2894 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1        (2) for contracts entered into on or after the 2    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 3    Assembly and before January 1, 2027, $40,000; and 4        (3) for contracts entered into on or after January 1, 5    2027, the maximum estimated basic professional services 6    fee for the calendar year immediately preceding the 7    calendar year in which the contract is entered into, 8    increased by a percentage equal to the annual unadjusted 9    percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index-u 10    during the 12-month period ending in September of the 11    immediately preceding calendar year and rounded to the 12    nearest $10. 13(Source: P.A. 92-861, eff. 1-3-03.) 14    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 15Sections 5-45020 and 5-45025 as follows: 16    (55 ILCS 5/5-45020)17    Sec. 5-45020. Development of scope and performance 18criteria.19    (a) The county shall develop, with the assistance of a 20licensed design professional or public art designer, a request 21for proposal, which shall include scope and performance 22criteria. The scope and performance criteria must be in 23sufficient detail and contain adequate information to 24reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of the   HB2894 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1county's overall programmatic needs and goals, including 2criteria and preliminary design plans, general budget 3parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.4    (b) Each request for proposal shall also include a 5description of the level of design to be provided in the 6proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 7renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 8will be required by the county to be produced by the 9design-build entities. 10    (c) The scope and performance criteria shall be prepared 11by a design professional or public art designer who is an 12employee of the county, or the county may contract with an 13independent design professional or public art designer 14selected under the Local Government Professional Services 15Selection Act to provide these services. 16    (d) The design professional or public art designer that 17prepares the scope and performance criteria is prohibited from 18participating in any design-build entity proposal for the 19project. 20    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 21subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 22county to make modifications in the project scope without 23invalidating the design-build contract. 24(Source: P.A. 102-954, eff. 1-1-23.) 25    (55 ILCS 5/5-45025)  HB2894 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1    Sec. 5-45025. Procedures for Selection.2    (a) The county must use a two-phase procedure for the 3selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I of 4the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 5entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 6the technical and cost proposals.7    (b) The county shall include in the request for proposal 8the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These factors are 9in addition to any prequalification requirements of 10design-build entities that the county has set forth. Each 11request for proposal shall establish the relative importance 12assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 13any weighting of criteria to be employed by the county. The 14county must maintain a record of the evaluation scoring to be 15disclosed in event of a protest regarding the solicitation. 16    The county shall include the following criteria in every 17Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) experience of 18personnel; (ii) successful experience with similar project 19types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) timeliness of past 20performance; (v) experience with similarly sized projects; 21(vi) successful reference checks of the firm; (vii) commitment 22to assign personnel for the duration of the project and 23qualifications of the entity's consultants; and (viii) ability 24or past performance in meeting or exhausting good faith 25efforts to meet the utilization goals for business enterprises 26established in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women,   HB2894 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1and Persons with Disabilities Act and with Section 2-105 of 2the Illinois Human Rights Act. The county may include any 3additional relevant criteria in Phase I that it deems 4necessary for a proper qualification review. 5    The county may not consider any design-build entity for 6evaluation or award if the entity has any pecuniary interest 7in the project or has other relationships or circumstances, 8including, but not limited to, long-term leasehold, mutual 9performance, or development contracts with the county, that 10may give the design-build entity a financial or tangible 11advantage over other design-build entities in the preparation, 12evaluation, or performance of the design-build contract or 13that create the appearance of impropriety. A design-build 14entity shall not be disqualified under this Section solely due 15to having previously been awarded a project or projects under 16any applicable public procurement statute of the State. No 17proposal shall be considered that does not include an entity's 18plan to comply with the requirements established in the 19Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 20Disabilities Act, for both the design and construction areas 21of performance, and with Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human 22Rights Act. 23    Upon completion of the qualifications evaluation, the 24county shall create a shortlist of the most highly qualified 25design-build entities. The county, in its discretion, is not 26required to shortlist the maximum number of entities as   HB2894 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1identified for Phase II evaluation, provided that no less than 22 design-build entities nor more than 6 are selected to submit 3Phase II proposals. If a county receives one response to Phase 4I, nothing in this Section shall prohibit the county from 5proceeding with a Phase II evaluation of the single respondent 6if the county, in its discretion, finds proceeding to be in its 7best interest. 8    The county shall notify the entities selected for the 9shortlist in writing. This notification shall commence the 10period for the preparation of the Phase II technical and cost 11evaluations. The county must allow sufficient time for the 12shortlist entities to prepare their Phase II submittals 13considering the scope and detail requested by the county. 14    (c) The county shall include in the request for proposal 15the evaluating factors to be used in the technical and cost 16submission components of Phase II. Each request for proposal 17shall establish, for both the technical and cost submission 18components of Phase II, the relative importance assigned to 19each evaluation factor and subfactor, including any weighting 20of criteria to be employed by the county. The county must 21maintain a record of the evaluation scoring to be disclosed in 22event of a protest regarding the solicitation. 23    The county shall include the following criteria in every 24Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 25compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance of 26proposed services to the request for proposal requirements;   HB2894 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 2of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 3meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii) 4constructability of the proposed project. The county may 5include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 6it deems necessary for proper selection. 7    The county shall include the following criteria in every 8Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost, the 9construction costs, and the time of completion. The county may 10include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 11it deems necessary for proper selection. The total project 12cost criteria weighting factor shall not exceed 30%. 13    The county shall directly employ or retain a licensed 14design professional or a public art designer to evaluate the 15technical and cost submissions to determine if the technical 16submissions are in accordance with generally accepted industry 17standards. Upon completion of the technical submissions and 18cost submissions evaluation, the county may award the 19design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity. 20(Source: P.A. 102-954, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Sections 11-39.2-20 and 11-39.2-25 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/11-39.2-20)24    Sec. 11-39.2-20. Development of scope and performance   HB2894 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1criteria.2    (a) The municipality must develop, with the assistance of 3a licensed design professional or public art designer, a 4request for proposal, which must include scope and performance 5criteria. The scope and performance criteria must be in 6sufficient detail and contain adequate information to 7reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of the 8municipality's overall programmatic needs and goals, including 9criteria and preliminary design plans, general budget 10parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.11    (b) Each request for proposal must also include a 12description of the level of design to be provided in the 13proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 14renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 15will be required by the municipality to be produced by the 16design-build entities. 17    (c) The scope and performance criteria must be prepared by 18a design professional or public art designer who is an 19employee of the municipality, or the municipality may contract 20with an independent design professional or public art designer 21selected under the Local Government Professional Services 22Selection Act to provide these services. 23    (d) The design professional or public art designer that 24prepares the scope and performance criteria is prohibited from 25participating in any design-build entity proposal for the 26project.   HB2894 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 2subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 3municipality to make modifications in the project scope 4without invalidating the design-build contract. 5(Source: P.A. 103-491, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-39.2-25)7    Sec. 11-39.2-25. Procedures for Selection.8    (a) The municipality must use a two-phase procedure for 9the selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I 10of the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 11entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 12the technical and cost proposals.13    (b) The municipality must include in the request for 14proposal the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These 15factors are in addition to any prequalification requirements 16of design-build entities that the municipality has set forth. 17Each request for proposal must establish the relative 18importance assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, 19including any weighting of criteria to be employed by the 20municipality. The municipality must maintain a record of the 21evaluation scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest 22regarding the solicitation. 23    The municipality must include the following criteria in 24every Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 25experience of personnel; (ii) successful experience with   HB2894 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1similar project types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) 2timeliness of past performance; (v) experience with similarly 3sized projects; (vi) successful reference checks of the firm; 4(vii) commitment to assign personnel for the duration of the 5project and qualifications of the entity's consultants; and 6(viii) ability or past performance in meeting or exhausting 7good faith efforts to meet the utilization goals for business 8enterprises established in the Business Enterprise for 9Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act and with 10Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. The 11municipality may include any additional, relevant criteria in 12Phase I that it deems necessary for a proper qualification 13review. 14    The municipality may not consider any design-build entity 15for evaluation or award if the entity has any pecuniary 16interest in the project or has other relationships or 17circumstances, such as long-term leasehold, mutual 18performance, or development contracts with the municipality, 19that may give the design-build entity a financial or tangible 20advantage over other design-build entities in the preparation, 21evaluation, or performance of the design-build contract or 22that create the appearance of impropriety. A design-build 23entity shall not be disqualified under this Section solely due 24to having previously been awarded a project or projects under 25any applicable public procurement statute of the State. No 26proposal may be considered that does not include an entity's   HB2894 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1plan to comply with the requirements established in the 2Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 3Disabilities Act, for both the design and construction areas 4of performance, and with Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human 5Rights Act. 6    Upon completion of the qualification evaluation, the 7municipality must create a shortlist of the most highly 8qualified design-build entities. The municipality, in its 9discretion, is not required to shortlist the maximum number of 10entities as identified for Phase II evaluation if no less than 112 design-build entities nor more than 6 are selected to submit 12Phase II proposals. If a municipality receives one response to 13Phase I, nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 14municipality from proceeding with a Phase II evaluation of the 15single respondent if the municipality, in its discretion, 16finds proceeding to be in its best interest. 17    The municipality must notify the entities selected for the 18shortlist in writing. This notification must commence the 19period for the preparation of the Phase II technical and cost 20evaluations. The municipality must allow sufficient time for 21the shortlist entities to prepare their Phase II submittals 22considering the scope and detail requested by the 23municipality. 24    (c) The municipality must include in the request for 25proposal the evaluating factors to be used in the technical 26and cost submission components of Phase II. Each request for   HB2894 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1proposal must establish, for both the technical and cost 2submission components of Phase II, the relative importance 3assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 4any weighting of criteria to be employed by the municipality. 5The municipality must maintain a record of the evaluation 6scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest regarding the 7solicitation. 8    The municipality must include the following criteria in 9every Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: 10(i) compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance 11of proposed services to the request for proposal requirements; 12(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 13of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 14meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii) 15constructability of the proposed project. The municipality may 16include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 17it deems necessary for proper selection. 18    The municipality must include the following criteria in 19every Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost, the 20construction costs, and the time of completion. The 21municipality may include any additional relevant technical 22evaluation factors it deems necessary for proper selection. 23The total project cost criteria weighting factor may not 24exceed 30%. 25    The municipality must directly employ or retain a licensed 26design professional or a public art designer to evaluate the   HB2894 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1technical and cost submissions to determine if the technical 2submissions are in accordance with generally accepted industry 3standards. Upon completion of the technical submissions and 4cost submissions evaluation, the municipality may award the 5design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity. 6(Source: P.A. 103-491, eff. 1-1-24.) 7    Section 20. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 8changing Section 11k as follows: 9    (70 ILCS 705/11k)10    Sec. 11k. Competitive bidding; notice requirements.11    (a) The board of trustees shall have the power to acquire 12by gift, legacy, or purchase any personal property necessary 13for its corporate purposes provided that all contracts for 14supplies, materials, or work involving an expenditure in 15excess of $20,000 shall be let to the lowest responsible 16bidder after advertising as required under subsection (b) of 17this Section; except that, if the board of trustees seeks to 18purchase equipment directly from a dealer or an original 19manufacturer in excess of $50,000, then the contract for 20purchase shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after 21advertising as required under subsection (b) of this Section. 22The board is not required to accept a bid that does not meet 23the district's established specifications, terms of delivery, 24quality, and serviceability requirements. Contracts which, by   HB2894 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1their nature, are not adapted to award by competitive bidding, 2are not subject to competitive bidding, including, but not 3limited to:4        (1) contracts for the services of individuals 5    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the 6    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 7    part;8        (2) contracts for the printing of finance committee 9    reports and departmental reports;10        (3) contracts for the printing or engraving of bonds, 11    tax warrants, and other evidences of indebtedness;12        (4) contracts for the maintenance or servicing of, or 13    provision of repair parts for, equipment which are made 14    with the manufacturer or authorized service agent of that 15    equipment where the provision of parts, maintenance, or 16    servicing can best be performed by the manufacturer or 17    authorized service agent, or which involve proprietary 18    parts or technology not otherwise available;19        (5) purchases and contracts for the use, purchase, 20    delivery, movement, or installation of data processing 21    equipment, software, or services and telecommunications 22    and interconnect equipment, software, and services;23        (6) contracts for duplicating machines and supplies;24        (7) contracts for utility services such as water, 25    light, heat, telephone or telegraph;26        (8) contracts for goods or services procured from   HB2894 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1    another governmental agency;2        (9) purchases of equipment previously owned by some 3    entity other than the district itself; and4        (10) contracts for goods or services which are 5    economically procurable from only one source, such as for 6    the purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets, 7    reports, and online subscriptions.8    Contracts for emergency expenditures are also exempt from 9competitive bidding when the emergency expenditure is approved 10by a vote of 3/4 of the members of the board.11    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this 12Section, all proposals to award contracts involving amounts in 13excess of $20,000 shall be published at least 10 days, 14excluding Sundays and legal holidays, in advance of the date 15announced for the receiving of bids, in a secular English 16language newspaper of general circulation throughout the 17district. In addition, a fire protection district that has a 18website that the full-time staff of the district maintains 19shall post notice on its website of all proposals to award 20contracts in excess of $20,000. Advertisements for bids shall 21describe the character of the proposed contract or agreement 22in sufficient detail to enable the bidders thereon to know 23what their obligations will be, either in the advertisement 24itself, or by reference to detailed plans and specifications 25on file at the time of the publication of the first 26announcement. Such advertisement shall also state the date,   HB2894 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1time and place assigned for the opening of bids, and no bids 2shall be received at any time subsequent to the time indicated 3in the announcement. All competitive bids for contracts 4involving an expenditure in excess of $20,000 must be sealed 5by the bidder and must be opened by a member of the board or an 6employee of the district at a public bid opening at which the 7contents of the bids must be announced. Each bidder must 8receive at least 3 days' notice of the time and place of the 9bid opening.10    (c) In addition to contracts entered into under the 11Governmental Joint Purchasing Act, a board of trustees may 12enter into contracts for supplies, materials, or work 13involving an expenditure in excess of $20,000 through 14participation in a joint governmental or nongovernmental 15purchasing program that requires as part of its selection 16procedure a competitive solicitation and procurement process.17    (d) Subject to the exceptions under subsections (a) and 18(c), any procurement by a board of trustees involving the 19acquisition, by direct or beneficial ownership, of 20improvements to real estate by a fire protection district 21which results in an expenditure of district funds in excess of 22$20,000 must be competitively bid in accordance with the 23procedures of subsection (b). 24    (e) Nothing in this Section prohibits a fire protection 25district from entering into design-build contracts. Fire 26protection districts are authorized to use a design-build   HB2894 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1contracting method for construction if a competitive process 2consistent with the purpose of this Section is used in 3connection with the selection of the design-builder. 4(Source: P.A. 102-138, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff 8-20-21; 5103-634, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    Section 25. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 7by changing Section 8 as follows: 8    (110 ILCS 205/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 188)9    Sec. 8. The Board of Trustees of the University of 10Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 11University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 12the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 13Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 14Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 15of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 16Northern Illinois University, and the Board of Trustees of 17Western Illinois University shall submit to the Board not 18later than the 15th day of November of each year their its 19budget proposals for the operation and capital needs of the 20institutions under their its governance or supervision for the 21ensuing fiscal year. The Illinois Community College Board 22shall submit to the Board by December 15 of each year its 23budget proposal for the operation and capital needs of the 24institutions under its governance or supervision for the   HB2894 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1ensuing fiscal year. Each budget proposal shall conform to the 2procedures developed by the Board in the design of an 3information system for State universities and colleges.4    In order to maintain a cohesive system of higher 5education, the Board and its staff shall communicate on a 6regular basis with all public university presidents. They 7shall meet at least semiannually to achieve economies of scale 8where possible and provide the most innovative and efficient 9programs and services.10    The Board, in the analysis of formulating the annual 11budget request, shall consider rates of tuition and fees and 12undergraduate tuition and fee waiver programs at the State 13universities and colleges. The Board shall also consider the 14current and projected utilization of the total physical plant 15of each campus of a university or college in approving the 16capital budget for any new building or facility.17    The Board of Higher Education shall submit to the 18Governor, to the General Assembly, and to the appropriate 19budget agencies of the Governor and General Assembly its 20analysis and recommendations on such budget proposals.21    The Board is directed to form a broad-based group of 22individuals representing the Office of the Governor, the 23General Assembly, public institutions of higher education, 24State agencies, business and industry, statewide organizations 25representing faculty and staff, and others as the Board shall 26deem appropriate to devise a system for allocating State   HB2894 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1resources to public institutions of higher education based 2upon performance in achieving State goals related to student 3success and certificate and degree completion. 4    Beginning in Fiscal Year 2013, the Board of Higher 5Education budget recommendations to the Governor and the 6General Assembly shall include allocations to public 7institutions of higher education based upon performance 8metrics designed to promote and measure student success in 9degree and certificate completion. Public university metrics 10must be adopted by the Board by rule, and public community 11college metrics must be adopted by the Illinois Community 12College Board by rule. These metrics must be developed and 13promulgated in accordance with the following principles:14        (1) The metrics must be developed in consultation with 15    public institutions of higher education, as well as other 16    State educational agencies and other higher education 17    organizations, associations, interests, and stakeholders 18    as deemed appropriate by the Board.19        (2) The metrics shall include provisions for 20    recognizing the demands on and rewarding the performance 21    of institutions in advancing the success of students who 22    are academically or financially at risk, including 23    first-generation students, low-income students, and 24    students traditionally underrepresented in higher 25    education, as specified in Section 9.16 of this Act.26        (3) The metrics shall recognize and account for the   HB2894 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1    differentiated missions of institutions and sectors of 2    higher education.3        (4) The metrics shall focus on the fundamental goal of 4    increasing completion of college courses, certificates, 5    and degrees. Performance metrics shall recognize the 6    unique and broad mission of public community colleges 7    through consideration of additional factors, including, 8    but not limited to, enrollment, progress through key 9    academic milestones, transfer to a baccalaureate 10    institution, and degree completion.11        (5) The metrics must be designed to maintain the 12    quality of degrees, certificates, courses, and programs.13In devising performance metrics, the Board may be guided by 14the report of the Higher Education Finance Study Commission. 15    Each State university must submit its plan for capital 16improvements of non-instructional facilities to the Board for 17approval before final commitments are made if the total cost 18of the project as approved by the institution's board of 19control is in excess of $2 million. Non-instructional uses 20shall include but not be limited to dormitories, union 21buildings, field houses, stadium, other recreational 22facilities and parking lots. The Board shall determine whether 23or not any project submitted for approval is consistent with 24the strategic plan for higher education and with instructional 25buildings that are provided for therein. If the project is 26found by a majority of the Board not to be consistent, such   HB2894 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 10096 JDS 20168 b1capital improvement shall not be constructed.2(Source: P.A. 102-1046, eff. 6-7-22; 103-940, eff. 8-9-24; 3revised 8-23-24.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 52025.